Washington statutes.
RCW 35.53.030

Sale or lease of trust property.

A city or town may lease or sell and convey any such property held in trust by it, by virtue of the conveyance thereof to it by a local improvement assessment deed. The sale may be public or private and for such price and upon such terms as may be determined by resolution of the council, any provisions of law, charter, or ordinance to the contrary notwithstanding. After first reimbursing any funds which may have advanced moneys on account of any lot, tract, or parcel, all proceeds resulting from lease or sale thereof shall ratably belong and be paid into the funds of the local improvement concerned.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.53.030. Prior: 1927 c 275 s 4; 1911 c 98 s 32; RRS s 9384.]